Mississippi, session 2026, HB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Any person who knowingly and willfully transports into this state an unauthorized alien as defined by Section 71-11-3, whom the person knows or should have known has entered the United States in violation of law shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (2)  Any person who shall forge or counterfeit any government document for an unauthorized alien as defined by Section 71-11-3 with the intent to help the alien appear as a lawful citizen of the United States or this state shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. SECTION 2.  Section 45-1-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-3.  (1)  When not otherwise specifically provided, the commissioner is authorized to make and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to be coordinated, and carry out the general provisions of the Highway Safety Patrol * * *and, the Driver's License Law of 1938 and assist local law enforcement efforts to enforce state and federal laws against unauthorized aliens as defined by Section 71-11-3. (2)  The commissioner shall have the authority to administer oaths. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with written approval from the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, the commissioner may enter into a lease or sublease agreement for space in the Department of Public Safety headquarters building with a third party for the purpose of providing services and assistance to the department and its employees.  The proceeds received from the lease under this subsection shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit into the General Fund. SECTION 3.  Section 71-1-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-1-49.  (1)  No person who is an unauthorized alien as defined in Section 71-11-3, or who is or has been a member of the Communist Party, or who has been convicted of or served any part of a prison term resulting from his conviction of robbery, bribery, extortion, embezzlement, grand larceny, burglary, arson, violation of narcotics laws, murder, rape, assault with intent to kill, or conspiracy to commit any such crimes, shall serve: (a)  As an officer, director, trustee, member of any executive board or similar governing body, business agent, manager, organizer, or other employee (other than as an employee performing exclusively clerical or custodial duties) of any labor organization, or as a manager, or any person occupying a bargaining position with industry, or (b)  As a labor relations consultant either of a labor organization or of an employer or both, or as an officer, director, agent, or employee (other than as an employee performing exclusively clerical or custodial duties) of any group or association of employers dealing with any labor organization, during or for five (5) years after the termination of his membership in the Communist Party, or for five (5) years after such conviction, or after the end of such imprisonment.  No labor organization, group or association of employers, or officer thereof shall knowingly permit any person to assume or hold any office or paid position in violation of this section. (2)  Any person who willfully violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be fined not * * * more less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), nor more than Five Thousand Hundred Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. (3)  For the purposes of this section, any person shall be deemed to have been "convicted" and under the disability of "conviction" from the date of the judgment of the trial court or the date of the final sustaining of such judgment on appeal, whichever is the later event, regardless of whether such conviction occurred before or after July 1, 1960. SECTION 4.  Section 71-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-11-1.  The Legislature finds that when illegal immigrants have been sheltered and harbored in this state and encouraged to reside in this state through the benefit of work without verifying immigration status, these practices impede and obstruct the enforcement of federal immigration law, undermine the security of our borders, and impermissibly restrict the privileges and immunities of the citizens of Mississippi.  The Legislature further finds that illegal immigration is encouraged when public agencies within this state provide and support public benefits without verifying immigration status.  The Legislature further finds that the Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution reserves to the states those powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution.  Therefore, the Legislature declares that it is a compelling public interest of this state to discourage illegal immigration by requiring all agencies within this state to fully cooperate with federal immigration authorities in the enforcement of federal immigration laws.  The Legislature also finds that other measures are necessary to ensure the integrity of various governmental programs and services. SECTION 5.  Section 71-11-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 71-11-3.  (1)  This chapter shall be known as the "Mississippi Employment Protection Act." (2)  The provisions of this section shall be enforced without regard to race, gender, religion, ethnicity or national origin. (3)  For the purpose of this section only, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the content clearly states otherwise: (a) "Employer" is any person or business that is required by federal or state law to issue a United States Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 or Form 1099 to report income paid to employed or contracted personnel in Mississippi, and shall include any public employer as defined by this subsection. (b) "Employee" is any person or entity that is hired to perform work within the State of Mississippi and to whom a United States Internal Revenue Service Form W-2 or Form 1099 must be issued. (c)  "Third-party employer" is any person or company that provides workers for another person or company.  This includes, but is not limited to, leasing companies and contract employers. (d)  "Status verification system" means the electronic verification of work authorization program of the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigration Responsibility Act of 1996, Public Law 104-208, Division C, Section 403(a); 8 USC, Section 1324a, and operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security, known as the E-Verify Program. (e)  "Unauthorized alien" means an alien as defined in Section 1324a(h)(3) of Title 8 of the United States Code. (f)  "Public employer" means every department, agency or instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision of the state. (g) "Subcontractor" means a subcontractor, contract employee, staffing agency or any contractor regardless of its tier. (4)  (a)  Employers in the State of Mississippi shall only hire employees who are legal citizens of the United States of America or are legal aliens.  For purposes of this section, a legal alien is an individual who was lawfully present in the United States at the time of employment and for the duration of employment, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time of employment and for the duration of employment. (b)  (i)  Every employer shall register with and utilize the status verification system to verify the federal employment authorization status of all newly hired employees. (ii)  No contractor or subcontractor shall hire any employee unless the contractor or subcontractor registers and participates in the status verification system to verify the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees. (iii)  No contractor or subcontractor who enters into a contract with a public employer shall enter into such a contract or subcontract unless the contractor or subcontractor registers and participates in the status verification system to verify information of all newly hired employees. (c)  The provision of this section shall not apply to any contracts entered into on or before July 1, 2008. (d)  It shall be a discriminatory practice for an employer to discharge an employee working in Mississippi who is a United States citizen or permanent resident alien while retaining an employee who the employing entity knows, or reasonably should have known * * *, is an unauthorized alien hired after July 1, 2008, and who is working in Mississippi in a job category that requires equal skill, effort and responsibility, and which is performed under similar working conditions, as defined by 29 USC, Section 206(d)(1), as the job category held by the discharged employee. (e)  An employing entity which, on the date of the discharge in question, was enrolled in and used the status verification system to verify the employment eligibility of its employees in Mississippi * * * hired after July 1, 2008, shall be exempt from liability, investigation or suit arising from any action under this section.  Proof of such verification shall be required by the employing entity. (f)  No cause of action for a violation of this section shall lie under any other Mississippi law but shall arise solely from the provisions of this section. (5)  Any employer that complies with the requirements of this section shall be held harmless by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, provided the employer is not directly involved in the creation of any false documents, and provided that the employer did not knowingly and willfully accept false documents from the employee. (6)  (a)  All third-party employers that conduct business in Mississippi shall register to do business in Mississippi with the Mississippi Department of Employment Security before placing employees into the workforce in Mississippi. (b)  Third-party employers shall provide proof of registration and any participation in the status verification system to any Mississippi employer with whom they do business. (7)  (a)  State of Mississippi agencies and political subdivisions, public contractors * * * and, public subcontractors and private employers * * * with two hundred fifty (250) or more employees shall meet verification requirements not later than July 1, 2008. (b) Employers with at least one hundred (100) but less than two hundred fifty (250) employees shall meet verification requirements not later than July 1, 2009. (c) Employers with at least thirty (30) but less than one hundred (100) employees shall meet verification requirements not later than July 1, 2010. (d) All employers shall meet verification requirements not later than July 1, 2011 shall meet verification requirements. ( * * *eb)  (i)  Any employer violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to the cancellation of any state or public contract, resulting in ineligibility for any state or public contract for up to three (3) years, the loss of any license, permit, certificate or other document granted to the employer by any agency, department or government entity in the State of Mississippi for the right to do business in Mississippi for up to one (1) year, or both. (ii)  The contractor or employer shall be liable for any additional costs incurred by the agencies and institutions of the State of Mississippi, or any of its political subdivisions, because of the cancellation of the contract or the loss of any license or permit to do business in the state. (iii)  Any person or entity penalized under this section shall have the right to appeal to the appropriate entity bringing charges or to the circuit court of competent jurisdiction. ( * * *fc)  The Department of Employment Security, State Tax Commission, Secretary of State, Department of Human Services and the Attorney General shall have the authority to seek penalties under this section and to bring charges for noncompliance against any employer or employee. (8)  (a)  There shall be no liability under this section in the following circumstances: (i)  An employer who hires an employee through a state or federal work program that requires verification of the employee's social security number and provides for verification of the employee's lawful presence in the United States in an employment-authorized immigration status; (ii)  Any candidate for employment referred by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, if the Mississippi Department of Employment Security has verified the social security number and provides for verification of the candidate's lawful presence in the United States in an employment-authorized immigration status; or (iii)  Individual homeowners who hire workers on their private property for noncommercial purposes, unless required by federal law to do so. (b)  (i) Compliance with the sections of this statute shall not exempt the employer from regulations and requirements related to any federal laws or procedures related to employers. (ii)  This section shall not be construed as an attempt to preempt federal law. (c)  (i)  It shall be a felony for any person to accept or perform employment for compensation knowing or in reckless disregard that the person is an unauthorized alien with respect to employment during the period in which the unauthorized employment occurred. Upon conviction, a violator shall be subject to imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or both. (ii)  For purposes of determining bail for persons who are charged under this section, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that a defendant who has entered and remains in the United States unlawfully is deemed at risk of flight for purposes of bail determination. SECTION 6.  Section 83-17-407, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-407.  The commissioner may waive any license requirement for an applicant with a valid license from another state having license requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state, or an applicant with a certification from a person or entity approved by the commissioner that provides adjuster education and training and has met the standards as set forth by the commissioner regarding pre-licensing coursework and examination.  No applicant with a valid license from another state shall be rejected solely on the basis that the individual is not a resident of the United States of America; however, any applicant who is an unauthorized alien as defined by Section 71-11-3 shall be rejected. SECTION 7.  Section 41-9-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-9-67.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided by law, hospital records shall not constitute public records, and nothing contained in Sections 41-9-61 through 41-9-83 shall be deemed to impair any privilege of confidence conferred by law or the Mississippi Rules of Evidence on patients, their personal representatives or heirs, by Section 13-1-21, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  Hospitals shall maintain a record of the number of unauthorized aliens it serves.  Such record shall be a public record. SECTION 8.  Section 97-3-54.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-3-54.1.  (1)  (a) A person who coerces, recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides or obtains by any means, or attempts to coerce, recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide or obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that the person will be subjected to forced labor or services, or who benefits, whether financially or by receiving anything of value from participating in an enterprise that he knows or reasonably should have known has engaged in such acts, shall be guilty of the crime of human trafficking. (b)  A person who knowingly purchases the forced labor or services of a trafficked person or who otherwise knowingly subjects, or attempts to subject, another person to forced labor or services or who benefits, whether financially or by receiving anything of value from participating in an enterprise that he knows or reasonably should have known has engaged in such acts, shall be guilty of the crime of procuring involuntary servitude. (c)  A person who knowingly subjects, or attempts to subject, or who recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides or obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide or obtain by any means, a minor, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, or causes or attempts to cause a minor to engage in commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, shall be guilty of procuring sexual servitude of a minor and shall be punished by commitment to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than twenty (20) years nor more than life in prison, or by a fine of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) nor more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), or both.  It is not a defense in a prosecution under this section that a minor consented to engage in the commercial sexual activity, sexually explicit performance, or the production of sexually oriented material, or that the defendant reasonably believed that the minor was eighteen (18) years of age or older. (2)  If the victim is not a minor, a person who is convicted of an offense set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than two (2) years nor more than twenty (20) years, or by a fine of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or both.  If the victim of the offense is a minor, a person who is convicted of an offense set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than twenty (20) years nor more than life in prison, or by a fine of not less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) nor more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or both. (3)  An enterprise may be prosecuted for an offense under this chapter if: (a)  An agent of the enterprise knowingly engages in conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter while acting within the scope of employment and for the benefit of the entity. (b)  An employee of the enterprise engages in conduct that constitutes an offense under this chapter and the commission of the offense was part of a pattern of illegal activity for the benefit of the enterprise, which an agent of the enterprise either knew was occurring or recklessly disregarded, and the agent failed to take effective action to stop the illegal activity. (c)  It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution of an enterprise that the enterprise had in place adequate procedures, including an effective complaint procedure, designed to prevent persons associated with the enterprise from engaging in the unlawful conduct and to promptly correct any violations of this chapter. (d)  The court may consider the severity of the enterprise's offense and order penalties, including: (i) a fine of not more than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00); (ii) disgorgement of profit; and (iii) debarment from government contracts. Additionally, the court may order any of the relief provided in Section 97-3-54.7. (4)  In addition to the mandatory reporting provisions contained in Sections 43-21-353 and 97-5-51, any person who has reasonable cause to suspect that a minor under the age of eighteen (18) is a trafficked person shall immediately make a report of the suspected child abuse or neglect to the Department of Child Protection Services and to the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator.  The Department of Child Protection Services or the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator, whichever is applicable, shall then immediately notify the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the suspected child abuse, neglect or trafficking occurred as required in Section 43-21-353, and the department that received the report shall also commence an initial investigation into the suspected abuse or neglect as required in Section 43-21-353.  The department that received such report shall provide an annual report to the Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, the Chairpersons of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees that includes the number of reports received, the number of cases screened in or out, the number of cases in which care and services were provided as a result of the report, and the type of care and services that were provided.  A minor who has been identified as a victim of trafficking shall not be liable for criminal activity in violation of this section. (5)  It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under this act that the defendant: (a)  Is a victim; and (b)  Committed the offense under a reasonable apprehension created by a person that, if the defendant did not commit the act, the person would inflict serious harm on the defendant, a member of the defendant's family, or a close associate. SECTION 9.  Section 97-3-54.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-3-54.2.  Anyone who knowingly destroys, conceals, removes, confiscates or possesses, or attempts to destroy, conceal, remove, confiscate or possess, any actual or purported passport or other immigration document, or any other actual or purported government identification document of any person to prevent or restrict, or attempt to prevent or restrict, without lawful authority, the person's liberty to move or travel in order to maintain the labor or services of that person, when the person is or has been a victim of a violation set out in Section 97-3-54.1, shall be punished by commitment to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than five (5) years. SECTION 10.  Section 63-1-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-1-19.  (1)  (a)  Every applicant for a license or permit issued pursuant to this article, or for renewal of such license or permit, shall file an application for such license, permit or renewal, on a form provided by the Department of Public Safety, with the commissioner or an official license examiner of the department.  All persons not holding valid, unexpired licenses issued in this state shall be required to secure an original license, except those specifically exempted from licensing under Section 63-1-7.  The application shall state the name, date of birth, the social security number of the applicant unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant's privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. (b)  Every applicant for an original license shall show proof of domicile in this state.  The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to enforce this requirement and shall prescribe the means by which an applicant for an original license may show domicile in this state.  Proof of domicile shall not be required of applicants under eighteen (18) years of age. (c)  Unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  No person who is illegally in the United States or Mississippi shall be issued a license.  The application of a person who is not a United States citizen and who does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government shall state the name, date of birth, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant's privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways.  The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as he deems appropriate requiring additional documents, materials, information or physical evidence to be provided by the applicant as may be necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and that the applicant is not present in the United States or the State of Mississippi illegally. (3)  Whenever a person who has applied for or who has been issued a license or permit under this article moves from the address listed in the application or on the permit or license, or whenever the name of a licensee changes by marriage or otherwise, such person, within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall notify, in writing, the Department of Public Safety, Driver Services Division, and inform the department of his or her previous address and new address and of his or her former name and new name.  The department shall not change the name of a licensee or permittee on his or her license or permit unless the applicant appears in person at an office of the department and provides a certified copy of his or her marriage license, court order, birth certificate or divorce decree changing the licensee's or permittee's name. (4)  (a)  Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for a permit or license or a renewal of a permit or license under this chapter shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Section 3802, as amended. (b)  The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System.  The applicant's submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration.  The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required.  The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law. SECTION 11.  Section 63-1-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-1-47.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, each applicant for an original or renewal Class R or Class D license issued pursuant to this article, who is entitled to issuance of same, shall be issued a four-year license or an eight-year license, at the option of the applicant, which will expire at midnight on the licensee's birthday and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration of the license upon application and payment of the required fee, unless required to be reexamined. (b)  The term of an ignition-interlock-restricted license issued under this article shall be four (4) years. (2)  Any commercial driver's license issued under Article 5 of this chapter shall be issued for a five-year term to expire at midnight on the licensee's birthday. (3)  (a)  All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age must be accompanied by documentation that the applicant is in compliance with the education requirements of Section 63-1-9(1)(g), and the documentation used in establishing compliance must be dated no more than thirty (30) days before the date of application. (b)  All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age, if applicable, must be accompanied by documentation signed and notarized by the parent or guardian of the applicant and the appropriate school official, authorizing the release of the applicant's attendance records to the Department of Public Safety as required under Section 63-1-10. (c)  The commissioner shall suspend the driver's license or learner's permit of a student under eighteen (18) years of age who has been reported by the Department of Education as required by Section 63-1-10.1, and shall give notice of the suspension to the licensee as provided in Section 63-1-52(4).  A school superintendent or designee may request that the driver's license or learner's permit that has been suspended under the provisions of this subsection be reinstated after the student has successfully completed nine (9) weeks of school attendance without an unlawful absence. (4)  (a)  Any original or renewal license issued under this chapter to a person who is not a United States citizen shall expire four (4) years from the date of issuance or on the expiration date of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States, whichever is the lesser period of time, and may be renewed, if the person is otherwise qualified to renew the license, within thirty (30) days of expiration.  The fee for any such license and for renewal shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43. (b)  Any applicant for an original or renewal license under this subsection (4) must present valid documentary evidence documenting that the applicant: (i)  Is a citizen or national of the United States; (ii)  Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States; (iii)  Has conditional permanent residence status in the United States; (iv)  Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status; (v)  Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into or lawful presence in the United States; (vi)  Has a pending application for asylum in the United States; (vii)  Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States; (viii)  Has approved deferred-action status; (ix)  Has a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States; or (x)  Has a valid employment authorization card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security. (5)  For any driver's license issued under this chapter, the Department of Public Safety shall send an email and text message notification of an upcoming driver's license expiration date to the known emails and phone numbers authorized by license holders for such notices not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration date of that license. SECTION 12.  Section 57-1-371, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-1-371.  Any business, enterprise or other entity that is criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants shall be ineligible to receive any loan, grant or other form of assistance made available under Section 57-93-1, Sections 2 through 37, Sections 57-1-10 and 57-95-1, Sections 40 through 55 and Sections 27-7-22.28 and 27-7-22.29 of Chapter 1, Laws of Third Extraordinary Session of 2005.  Any business, enterprise or other entity that receives any loan, grant or other form of assistance made available under Section 57-93-1, Sections 2 through 37, Sections 57-1-10 and 57-95-1, Sections 40 through 55 and Sections 27-7-22.28 and 27-7-22.29 of Chapter 1, Laws of Third Extraordinary Session of 2005, and is criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants shall repay the full amount of such loan, grant or other form of assistance. SECTION 13.  Section 57-1-373, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-1-373.  (1)  No business, enterprise or other entity that is, or has ever been, criminally convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants that develops or is located in a "project" as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) shall be eligible to receive: (a)  Any funds provided or derived from the issuance of any bonds under Sections 1 through 7, Chapter 2, Laws of First Extraordinary Session of 2006; (b)  Any loan, grant or other form of assistance that may be made available under Sections 1 through 7, Chapter 2, Laws of First Extraordinary Session of 2006; or (c)  Any funds, tax credit or other form of assistance that may be made available as an incentive payment under Sections 1 through 7, Chapter 2, Laws of First Extraordinary Session of 2006. (2)  If a business, enterprise or other entity that develops or is located in a "project" as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) has received funds or assistance as described in paragraphs (a) through (c) of subsection (1) of this section, and thereafter is convicted by a court of competent jurisdiction of intentionally hiring illegal immigrants, then the business, enterprise or other entity shall repay the full amount of the funds or assistance received.  The repayment shall be certified by the State Treasurer, who shall deposit such amounts into the specific special fund in the State Treasury from which the funds were awarded, or, in the case of incentive payments under Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5, into the State General Fund. SECTION 14.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.